Colorado, session 2026A, HB1128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-80-104.5 as
follows:
13-80-104.5. Limitation of actions for youth gender transition
procedures - severability - legislative declaration - definitions.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "PROVIDER" MEANS A PHYSICIAN, SURGEON,
ENDOCRINOLOGIST, MENTAL HEALTH PROFESSIONAL, CLINIC, HOSPITAL, OR
OTHER ENTITY INVOLVED IN RECOMMENDING, APPROVING, OR PROVIDING
A GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURE.
(b) "SEX" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL'S CLASSIFICATION AS ONE OF THE
ONLY TWO CLASSES OF HUMAN, MALE OR FEMALE, BASED ON THE TYPE OF
GAMETE THAT INDIVIDUAL HAS, HAD, WILL HAVE, OR WOULD HAVE BUT
FOR A CONGENITAL ANOMALY OR INTENTIONAL OR UNINTENTIONAL
DISRUPTION; THE CAPACITY TO PRODUCE AS DICTATED BY HIS OR HER
SEXUAL ANATOMY; AND WITHOUT REFERENCE TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S
PSYCHOLOGICAL STATE, BEHAVIOR, EXPRESSION, OR PERSONAL IDENTITY.
(c) (I) "YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURE" MEANS A
MEDICAL PROCESS PERFORMED BEFORE THE AGE OF TWENTY-SIX BY WHICH
AN INDIVIDUAL'S ANATOMY, PHYSIOLOGY, OR MENTAL STATE IS TREATED
OR ALTERED, INCLUDING BY THE REMOVAL OF OTHERWISE HEALTHY
ORGANS OR TISSUE, THE INTRODUCTION OF IMPLANTS OR PERFORMANCE
OF OTHER PLASTIC SURGERY, HORMONE TREATMENT, OR THE USE OF
DRUGS, COUNSELING, OR THERAPY, FOR THE PURPOSE OF FURTHERING OR
ASSISTING THE INDIVIDUAL'S IDENTIFICATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
OPPOSITE SEX, GROUP, OR DEMOGRAPHIC CATEGORY THAT DOES NOT
-2- HB26-1128

CORRESPOND TO THE INDIVIDUAL'S SEX, WHICH MAY INCLUDE:
(A) PRESCRIBING OR ADMINISTERING MEDICATION;
(B) PERFORMING A SURGERY THAT STERILIZES, INCLUDING
CASTRATION, VASECTOMY, HYSTERECTOMY, OOPHORECTOMY,
ORCHIECTOMY, AND PENECTOMY;
(C) PERFORMING A SURGERY THAT ARTIFICIALLY CONSTRUCTS
TISSUE WITH THE APPEARANCE OF GENITALIA THAT DIFFERS FROM THE
INDIVIDUAL'S SEX, INCLUDING METOIDIOPLASTY, PHALLOPLASTY, AND
VAGINOPLASTY; OR
(D) REMOVING ANY HEALTHY OR NONDISEASED BODY PART OR
TISSUE.
(II) "YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURE" DOES NOT INCLUDE
MALE CIRCUMCISION. MALE CIRCUMCISION IS RECOGNIZED AS BEING FOR
HYGIENIC OR RELIGIOUS PURPOSES AND IS NOT FOR THE PURPOSE OF
ATTEMPTING TO ALTER THE APPEARANCE OF OR AFFIRM AN INDIVIDUAL'S
PERCEPTION OF THEIR GENDER OR SEX WHEN THE ALTERED APPEARANCE
OR AFFIRMED PERCEPTION IS INCONSISTENT WITH THE INDIVIDUAL'S SEX.
(III) "YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURE" DOES NOT
INCLUDE A PROCEDURE UNDERTAKEN TO TREAT AN INDIVIDUAL BORN
WITH A MEDICALLY VERIFIABLE DISORDER OF SEX DEVELOPMENT,
INCLUDING AN INDIVIDUAL:
(A) BORN WITH EXTERNAL BIOLOGICAL SEX CHARACTERISTICS
THAT ARE AMBIGUOUS, INCLUDING AN INDIVIDUAL BORN WITH 46,XX
CHROMOSOMES WITH VIRILIZATION, AN INDIVIDUAL BORN WITH 46,XY
CHROMOSOMES WITH UNDERVIRILIZATION, OR AN INDIVIDUAL HAVING
BOTH OVARIAN AND TESTICULAR TISSUE; OR
(B) OTHERWISE DIAGNOSED WITH A DISORDER OF SEXUAL
-3- HB26-1128

DEVELOPMENT BY A PHYSICIAN WHEN THE PHYSICIAN HAS DETERMINED,
THROUGH GENETIC OR BIOCHEMICAL TESTING, THAT THE INDIVIDUAL DOES
NOT HAVE NORMAL SEX CHROMOSOME STRUCTURE, SEX STEROID
HORMONE PRODUCTION, OR SEX STEROID HORMONE ACTION.
(2) (a) AN ACTION BASED ON INTENTIONAL CONDUCT BROUGHT BY
AN INDIVIDUAL FOR RECOVERY OF DAMAGES FOR INJURY SUFFERED AS THE
RESULT OF A YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURE AGAINST THE
PROVIDER WHO COMMITTED THE ACT MUST BE COMMENCED BEFORE THE
INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS THE SUBJECT OF THE YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION
PROCEDURE THAT IS ALLEGED TO HAVE CAUSED THE INJURY REACHES
THIRTY-EIGHT YEARS OLD.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS
SPECIFIED IN THIS ARTICLE 80 OR ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW THAT CAN
BE CONSTRUED TO LIMIT THE TIME PERIOD TO COMMENCE AN ACTION
DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION, AN ACTION FOR RECOVERY OF DAMAGES FOR
LIABILITY AGAINST THE PROVIDER THAT OWED A DUTY OF CARE TO THE
INDIVIDUAL WHEN A WRONGFUL OR NEGLIGENT ACT BY AN EMPLOYEE,
OFFICER, DIRECTOR, OFFICIAL, VOLUNTEER, REPRESENTATIVE, OR AGENT
OF THE PROVIDER WAS A LEGAL CAUSE OF THE YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION
PROCEDURE THAT RESULTED IN THE INJURY TO THE INDIVIDUAL MUST BE
COMMENCED BEFORE THE INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS THE SUBJECT OF THE
YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURE THAT IS ALLEGED TO HAVE
CAUSED THE INJURY REACHES THIRTY-EIGHT YEARS OLD.
(3) THIS SECTION DOES NOT:
(a) WHOLLY OR PARTLY REPEAL, EITHER EXPRESSLY OR BY
IMPLICATION, ANY OTHER STATUTE THAT REGULATES OR PROHIBITS YOUTH
GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURES; OR
-4- HB26-1128

(b) RESTRICT A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION FROM REGULATING OR
PROHIBITING YOUTH GENDER TRANSITION PROCEDURES IN A MANNER THAT
IS AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE LAWS OF THIS STATE.
(4) (a) EVERY PROVISION, SECTION, SUBSECTION, SENTENCE,
CLAUSE, PHRASE, OR WORD IN THIS SECTION, AND EVERY APPLICATION OF
THE PROVISIONS IN THIS SECTION, IS SEVERABLE FROM EACH OTHER. IF
ANY APPLICATION OF ANY PROVISION IN THIS SECTION TO ANY PERSON,
GROUP OF PERSONS, OR CIRCUMSTANCES IS FOUND BY A COURT TO BE
INVALID, THE REMAINING APPLICATIONS OF THAT PROVISION TO ALL OTHER
PERSONS AND CIRCUMSTANCES MUST BE SEVERED AND MAY NOT BE
AFFECTED. ALL CONSTITUTIONALLY VALID APPLICATIONS OF THIS SECTION
MUST BE SEVERED FROM ANY APPLICATIONS THAT A COURT FINDS TO BE
INVALID, LEAVING THE VALID APPLICATIONS IN FORCE, BECAUSE IT IS THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY'S INTENT AND PRIORITY THAT THE VALID
APPLICATIONS BE ALLOWED TO STAND ALONE.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT IT WOULD HAVE
PASSED THIS SECTION, AND EACH PROVISION, SECTION, SUBSECTION,
SENTENCE, CLAUSE, PHRASE, OR WORD, AND ALL CONSTITUTIONAL
APPLICATIONS OF THIS SECTION, IRRESPECTIVE OF THE FACT THAT ANY
PROVISION, SECTION, SUBSECTION, SENTENCE, CLAUSE, PHRASE, OR WORD,
OR APPLICATIONS OF THIS SECTION, WERE TO BE DECLARED
UNCONSTITUTIONAL. IF ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION IS FOUND BY ANY
COURT TO BE UNCONSTITUTIONALLY VAGUE, THE APPLICATIONS OF THAT
PROVISION THAT DO NOT PRESENT CONSTITUTIONAL VAGUENESS
PROBLEMS MUST BE SEVERED AND REMAIN IN FORCE.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
-5- HB26-1128

the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to claims that have not been barred as of the
applicable effective date of this act.
-6- HB26-1128